Hawaii statutes.
§261-5.5 Passenger facility charge special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the passenger
facility charge special fund, into which shall be deposited all proceeds from
the passenger facility charge.

(b) The director of transportation shall
administer the passenger facility charge special fund.

(c) The passenger facility charge shall be a
charge for the use and services of an undertaking for the purposes and within
the meaning of section 39-61(a)(1) and (3). Notwithstanding any laws to the
contrary and without regard to chapter 91, the department may assess a
passenger facility charge as authorized under title 49 United States Code section
40117 and as provided under title 14 Code of Federal Regulations part 158 for
each overseas or international passenger who uses a state airport. The
department shall establish the passenger facility charge in accordance with
applicable federal laws and regulations. No passenger facility charge shall be
assessed on flight segments between two or more airports within the State.

(d) All moneys paid into the passenger
facility charge special fund shall be appropriated, applied, or expended by the
department for airport capital improvement program projects approved by the
legislature and as permitted under the Aviation Safety and Capacity Expansion
Act of 1990, codified as 49 United States Code section 40117, as amended from
time to time.

(e) Any resolution or certificate authorizing
any issue of bonds relating to the use of the passenger facility charge for an
airport capital improvement program project approved by the legislature may
establish other accounts within the passenger facility charge special fund and
require the transfer of the passenger facility charge into the other accounts
to pay debt service on the related bonds. [L 2003, c 213, §14; am L 2004, c
101, §5; am L 2009, c 147, §1; am L 2011, c 41, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next